California, session 20252026, AB2081.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14132.991 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:14132.991. (a) When administering the Home and Community-Based Alternatives (HCBA) Waiver, as authorized by subdivision (t) of Section 14132, the director may take the following actions, among others:(1) Contract with one or more organizations, referred to as a care management contractor, qualified to provide or arrange for delivery of care management and waiver services, including, but not limited to, personal needs assessments, and arranging for services available through public and private agencies, including services available under the waiver, for the waiver participants and applicants. The contract with the care management contractor, the care management contract, may require the care management contractor or their subcontractor, or both, to do all of the following, among other things:(A) Provide, arrange for, or subcontract with community-based providers for the provision of, waiver services to waiver participants.(B) Recognize program and service linkages, coordinate service delivery mechanisms and promote prevention of avoidable institutional placement, emergency room visits or inpatient hospital stays, or both, and coordination between health, social, and long-term services and supports by person-centered care planning.(C) Provide or arrange for, care management to each waiver participant to stabilize their health care, and provide access to home- and community-based services, including managing and anticipating episodes of medical crisis in which transitional care management is needed.(D) Carry out the waiver’s person-centered model of care, pursuant to the requirements set forth in Sections 441.720, 441.725, and 441.540 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(E) Submit all information and reports required by the department, including, but not limited to, annual financial statements in the timeframe specified by the department.(F) Pay any providers of waiver services who are not directly employed by or contracted with the care management contractor no less than the rates specified in the waiver or the department’s fee schedule, whichever is less, for the provider type.(G) Bill the department, at the rate established by the state, for all services the care management contractor provides to waiver participants, directly or through a subcontractor or other direct service provider.(H) Comply with the requirements of the waiver, including any other requirements established by the department regarding waiver operations, including, but not limited to, requirements regarding care coordination. These requirements may be set forth in the care management contract, care management manual, all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins or policy letters, or similar instructions.(2) Propose that the waiver provide for achievement of annual cost neutrality in the aggregate to allow enrollment and authorization of waiver services based on the medical necessity of the waiver services on a case-by-case basis.(3) Require care management contractors to enroll at least 60 percent of all total annual enrollments from either of the following:(A) Hospital, nursing facility, or other institutional settings assisting members with transitions back to the home or community, or both, setting.(B) Individuals who had been continuously receiving in home care services, of the type offered under the waiver, under the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment State Plan benefit, California Children Services or Pediatric Palliative Care programs for children, for at least the prior three months but have at the time of transition exceeded the age limit for that benefit.(4) If the director determines that the care management contractor is not fiscally solvent, or is in danger of becoming fiscally insolvent, the director has the option to immediately terminate the contract with the care management contractor.(5) Terminate or refuse to renew, in whole or in part, a care management contract when the director determines that the action is necessary to protect the health of the beneficiaries or funds appropriated to the Medi-Cal program.(b) Beginning in 2027, and for the HCBA Waiver period, the department shall ensure that the HCBA Waiver, including any renewal or successor waiver, provides for an annual increase of not fewer than 10,000 waiver slots for each waiver year. increase the total number of HCBA Waiver slots by 10,000, in addition to any planned expansion of waiver slots federally approved as of January 1, 2026. Nothing in this subdivision is intended to alter or supersede existing federal requirements applicable to the HCBA Waiver, including requirements related to enrollment priorities for individuals transitioning from institutional settings or similar programs and for individuals under 21 years of age. The addition of new waiver slots pursuant to this subdivision shall be implemented in a manner consistent with those requirements.(c)(1)The department shall prepare and submit an annual report to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, beginning on January 1, 2027, that provides all of the following information:(A)The total number of waiver slots available and filled for the preceding year.(B)The total number of individuals on the waiting list for waiver services, including a comparison to the preceding year’s waiting list numbers.(C)A demographic breakdown of individuals enrolled in the waiver during the preceding year, including, but not limited to, age, race, ethnicity, and primary language.(D)A summary of efforts undertaken by the department to reduce the waiting list and ensure that all available waiver slots are filled.(2)The department shall present the findings of this report annually to the appropriate policy and budget committees of the Legislature, beginning in 2027.(d)(c) (1) By March 1, 2027, the department shall seek any necessary amendments to the HCBA Waiver to ensure that there is sufficient capacity to enroll all individuals who are eligible for, and express an interest in, participating in the HCBA Waiver who are currently on a waiting list.(2) The department shall continue to monitor the capacity of the HCBA Waiver and shall expand capacity through any necessary HCBA Waiver amendments at least 180 calendar days prior to reaching capacity, based on enrollment trends, to ensure that no individual is placed on a waiting list for the HCBA Waiver.(e)(d) In order to achieve maximum cost savings, the Legislature hereby determines that an expedited contract process for contracts under this section is necessary. Therefore, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.(f)(1)This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals have been obtained and that federal financial participation is available.(e) (1) The department shall implement this section only to the extent that it can demonstrate federal cost neutrality as required under the terms of the HCBA Waiver, and only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available.(2) The department may seek amendments to the HCBA Waiver or take other actions as necessary to implement this section.(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of letters or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________